Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7987.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 30-15 of the General Laws entitled "Emergency Management" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
30-15-48. Warming and cooling center emergency action plans.
(a) By November 15, 2026, each city and town shall prepare a local emergency action plan
addressing coordination and communication procedures related to the operation of warming and
cooling centers during periods of extreme weather. The Rhode Island emergency management
agency (RIEMA), as established pursuant to the provisions of § 30-15-5, shall develop uniform
guidelines for the preparation of municipal emergency action plans under this section. The Rhode
Island executive office of housing established pursuant to the provisions of § 42-167-1 and the
Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns shall cooperate with RIEMA in developing the
guidelines.
(b) All municipal emergency action plans prepared pursuant to this section shall not be
considered final or complete until approved by RIEMA, with the cooperation of the executive office
of housing. Upon approval, the municipality shall formally adopt the plan.
(c) Each local plan shall:
(1) Identify communication protocols for informing the public during a declared warming
or cooling center alert including, but not limited to:
(i) Posting updates on the municipal website, social media channels, and United Way’s 211
system;

(ii) Sharing the availability of resources including shelters, warming or cooling centers,
and community-based support locations.
(2) Outline coordination procedures with nonprofit partners, volunteer organizations, and
state agencies for operational support, including:
(i) Provision of basic comfort items to include blankets, cots, mats, meals, and beverages
when a shelter or center is open for twenty-four (24) hours or more, with the comfort items to be
supplied through RIEMA coordination and/or donations.
(3) Include contact points for municipal departments and agencies, and identify potential
locations for activation in extreme weather.
(d) Municipalities may collaborate with neighboring cities or towns, regional agencies,
nonprofit service providers, or community volunteers to develop and implement emergency action
plans under this section. Volunteer-led initiatives may be included in municipal plans, provided
they coordinate with RIEMA and operate under the approved framework.
(e) Emergency action plans shall be updated every three (3) years, or more frequently if
required by RIEMA, and filed with the following:
(1) The Rhode Island emergency management agency;
(2) The Rhode Island executive office of housing;
(3) The municipal emergency management director, or designee;
(4) The chief of the municipal police department.
(f) RIEMA shall establish a statewide notification system in coordination with the National
Weather Service to initiate warming or cooling center alerts. The system shall be designed to trigger
the communication and coordination protocols set forth in municipal emergency action plans.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005820
========
LC005820 - Page 2 of 3